Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-803
State officers; appointment as deputy prohibited.

The Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, and State Librarian cannot appoint any of the others his or her deputy.

R.S.1866, c. 15, § 3, p. 127;

R.S.1913, § 5737;

C.S.1922, § 5066;

C.S.1929, § 84-803;

R.S.1943, § 84-803;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 54.